North Dakota, session 69, HB1393.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new chapter to title 13 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
1. a. "Charge" means:
(1) The amount imposed by a provider for delivery or expedited delivery of
proceeds to a consumer.
(2) A subscription or membership imposed by a provider for a bona fide group
of services that include earned wage access services.
b. The term does not include a voluntary tip, gratuity, or other donation.
2. " Commissioner" means the commissioner of financial institutions .
3. " Consumer" means an individual who resides in this state .
4. "Consumer-directed wage access services" means delivering to a consumer access to
earned but unpaid income that is based on the consumer's representations and the
provider's reasonable determination of the consumer's earned but unpaid income.
5. " Earned but unpaid income" means salary, wages, or compensation that a consumer
or an employer has represented, and that a provider reasonably has determined, has
been earned or accrued to the benefit of the consumer in exchange for the consumer's
provision of services to the employer or on behalf of the employer, including on an
Page No. 1 25.1073.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
hourly, project-based, piecework, or other basis, and including circumstances in which
the consumer is acting as an independent contractor of the employer, but has not, at
the time of the payment of proceeds, been paid to the consumer by the employer.
6. "Earned wage access services" means providing consumer-directed wage access
services or employer - integrated wage access services .
7. a. "Employer" means:
(1) A person who employs a consumer.
(2) Any other person who is contractually obligated to pay a consumer earned
but unpaid income in exchange for the consumer's provision of services to
the employer or on behalf of the employer including on an hourly, project-
based, piecework, or other basis and including circumstances in which the
consumer is acting as an independent contractor with respect to the
employer.
b. The term does not include:
(1) A customer of an employer.
(2) Any other person whose obligation to make a payment of salary, wages,
compensation, or other income to a consumer is not based on the provision
of services by that consumer for or on behalf of the person.
8. "Employer - integrated wage access services" means delivering to a consumer access
to earned but unpaid income that is based on employment, income, and attendance
data obtained directly or indirectly from an employer or an employer's payroll service
provider.
9. "Outstanding proceeds" means proceeds remitted to a consumer by a provider that
have not yet been repaid to the provider.
10. "Proceeds" means funds received by a consumer under an earned income access
transaction.
11. a. "Provider" or "earned wage access services provider" means a person that is in
the business of providing earned wage access services to consumers.
b. The terms do not include:
Page No. 2 25.1073.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
(1) A service provider, such as a payroll service provider, whose role may
include verifying the available earnings but is not contractually obligated to
fund any proceeds delivered as part of an earned wage access service; or
(2) An employer that offers a portion of salary, wages, or compensation directly
to its employees or independent contractors before the normally scheduled
pay date.
Administration.
The department of financial institutions shall administer and enforce this chapter. The
department has the power to promulgate rules, in accordance with chapter 28 - 32, as necessary
to carry out the provisions of this chapter.
License.
1. An individual or business entity, except for an exempt organization as defined in this
chapter, may not engage in the business of providing or offering earned income
access transactions to consumers, or enter an earned income access transaction with
a consumer, without first obtaining a license under this chapter. An individual or
business entity is considered to be engaging in the business of earned wage access
service if the consumer is located in this state.
2. An application for a license under this chapter must be in writing, under oath, and in
the form prescribed by the commissioner .
3. Each applicant shall maintain a tangible net worth of at least twenty-five thousand
dollars or other amount as the commissioner may determine necessary to protect the
public interests.
4. The financial responsibility, financial condition, business experience, character, and
general fitness of the applicant must reasonably warrant the belief that the applicant's
business will be conducted lawfully and fairly. In determining whether this qualification
is met and for the purpose of investigating compliance with this chapter, the
commissioner may review and consider the relevant business records and the capital
adequacy of the applicant and the competence, experience, integrity, and financial
ability of any person that is a member, partner, director, officer, or twenty - five percen t
or more shareholder of the applicant, and whether the applicant has filed any
appropriate registration with the secretary of state.
Page No. 3 25.1073.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
5. Each applicant shall establish that neither the individual nor any officer, director, or
proposed employee of the applicant has been convicted of a crime involving
dishonesty, fraud, or breach of trust. A deferred imposition of sentence or federal
pretrial diversion must be considered a conviction for purposes of this section.
6. Each applicant shall maintain a bond issued by a surety company authorized to
conduct business in this state, in the amount of fifty thousand dollars, and the
commissioner may require a larger bond if the commissioner determines the larger
bond is necessary based on the volume of the applicant's business.
7. Each application for a license must include:
a. An application fee as determined by the commissioner;
b. The legal name of the applicant, residence of the applicant, business address of
the applicant, and, if applicable, the address at which earned wage access
service is provided if different from the business address and, if the applicant is a
business entity, the name and address of every member, officer, and director;
c. The location at which the registered office of the applicant is located; and
d. Any other data or information the commissioner may require with respect to the
applicant and the applicant's directors, officers, members, and shareholders.
8. The commissioner may establish relationships or contracts with a nationwide
multistate licensing system and registry or other entities designated by a nationwide
multistate licensing system and registry to collect and maintain records and process
transaction fees or other fees related to licensees or other persons subject to the
chapter. The applicant shall pay directly to the nationwide multistate licensing system
any additional fee relating to participation in the nationwide multistate licensing
system.
9. In connection with an application for licensure as an earned wage access service
provider, or any license renewals, the applicant shall furnish to the nationwide
multistate licensing system information concerning the applicant's identity, which may
include:
a. Fingerprints for submission to the federal bureau of investigation and any
governmental agency or entity authorized to receive information for a state,
national, and international criminal history background check;
Page No. 4 25.1073.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
b. Personal history and experience in a form prescribed by the nationwide multistate
licensing system, including the submission of authorization for the nationwide
multistate licensing system and the commissioner to obtain:
(1) An independent credit report obtained from a consumer reporting agency
described in the Fair Credit Reporting Act [15 U.S.C. 1681a]; and
(2) Information related to any administrative, civil, or criminal findings by any
governmental jurisdiction; and
c. Any other documents, information, or evidence the commissioner deems
necessary.
10. The commissioner may use the nationwide multistate licensing system and registry as
a channeling agent for requesting information from and distributing information to the
department of justice or any governmental agency or to any other source.
11. Upon receipt of a completed application, the commissioner shall determine whether
the qualifications prescribed under this chapter are satisfied. The commissioner may
refuse to issue the license if the commissioner finds the financial responsibility,
experience, character, or general fitness of the applicant or any person associated
with the applicant are insufficient to warrant the belief the business will be conducted
honestly, fairly, and efficiently. If the commissioner determines the qualifications are
satisfied and approves the documents, the commissioner shall issue a license to
engage in the earned wage access service business.
Denial of license - Hearing - Notification of change in status .
1. If the commissioner determines an applicant is not qualified to receive a license, the
commissioner shall notify the applicant, in writing, stating the application is denied and
stating the basis for denial. If the commissioner denies an application, the applicant
may request a hearing in accordance with chapter 28 - 32 before the commissioner on
the question of whether the license should be granted. The hearing must be scheduled
within thirty days after receipt of the request. At the hearing, the commissioner shall
reconsider the application and issue a written order granting or denying the
application. If an applicant requests a hearing and the commissioner's denial is
upheld, the commissioner may assess the reasonable ou t - of-pocket costs incurred for
the hearing to the applicant.
Page No. 5 25.1073.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
2. Within fifteen days of the occurrence of any of the following events, a licensee shall file
a written report with the commissioner describing the event and the event's expected
impact on the activities of the licensee:
a. The filing for bankruptcy or reorganization by the licensee.
b. The institution of revocation or suspension proceedings against the licensee by
any governmental authority.
c. The filing of any criminal charges involving dishonesty, fraud, or breach of trust of
the licensee or any of the licensee's members, directors, officers, or
shareholders.
d. Any other event the commissioner identifies by rule.
License renewal.
A license may be renewed upon application, continued qualification for licensure as
required in this chapter, and the payment to the commissioner of the annual license fee, which
is not subject to refund, before December first of each year. A renewal application may be
denied upon the same grounds as would justify denial of an initial application for licensure.
When a licensee has been delinquent in renewing the licensee's license, the department may
charge an additional fee of fifty dollars for the renewal of the license. An application must be
filed within forty - five days from the date change of controlling ownership is completed. For
purposes of this section "controlling ownership" means ownership of twenty - five percent or
more of voting shares, or the power to appoint the majority of the board of directors. The earned
wage access license granted to the previous owner continues in effect to the new purchaser
until the application is either granted or denied.
Exemptions and applicability.
1. This chapter does not apply to banks, credit unions, or savings and loan associations.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, earned wage access services offered and
provided by a provider in accordance with this chapter may not be considered:
a. A violation of any law governing deductions from payroll, salary, wages,
compensation, or other income or the purchase, sale or assignment of, or an
order for earned but unpaid income.
b. A loan or other form of credit or debt. The provider may not be considered a
creditor, debt collector, or lender.
Page No. 6 25.1073.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
c. Money transmission. The provider may not be considered a money transmitter
with respect to the provision of any earned wage access services.
3. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, charges, voluntary tips, gratuities, or other
donations paid in accordance with this chapter to a provider may not be considered
interest or finance charges.
4. If there is a conflict between the provisions of this chapter and any other provision of
law, the provisions of this chapter prevail.
Records.
1. Each licensee shall keep and use in the licensee's business any books, accounts, and
records the commissioner may require. A licensee shall preserve required books,
accounts, and records for at least six years. The records of a licensee may be
maintained electronically if the records can be reproduced upon request by the
commissioner and within the time required under this section. When a licensee ceases
operations for any reason, the licensee shall inform the commissioner of the location
of the records. In addition, the licensee shall provide the name of the individual
responsible for maintenance of the records. The licensee shall notify the commissioner
within ten business days of the change of the location of the records or the change of
the individual responsible for maintenance of the records.
2. An applicant, licensee, or other person subject to this chapter shall comply with any
request for information, documents, or other records from the commissioner within the
time specified in the request, which must be a minimum of ten days, or, if no time is
specified, within thirty days of receipt of the request by the commissione r . If the
request for information is related to a new application or renewal of an existing
application and is not received by the commissioner within the time specified in the
request, or within thirty days of receip t of the request, the commissioner may deny the
application.
Suspension, nonrenewal, or revocation of license.
1. The commissioner may issue and serve upon any licensee an order suspending or
revoking a license if the commissioner finds the licensee has been convicted of a
felony or any crime involving dishonesty, fraud, or breach of trust, or the licensee
knowingly or through lack of reasonable care:
Page No. 7 25.1073.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
a. Failed to pay the annual license fee imposed under this chapter or any
examination fee imposed by the commissioner;
b. Committed any fraud, engaged in any dishonest activities, or made any
misrepresentations;
c. Violated this chapter or any rule adopted by the commissioner under this chapter
or violated any other law in the course of the licensee's business activities as a
licensee;
d. Made false statements in the application for the license;
e. Engaged in any unfair or deceptive acts, practices, or advertising in the conduct
of an earned wage access business;
f. Failed to fully cooperate with an examination or investigation authorized by the
commissioner;
g. Continued to allow any current or former officer, director, or employee to provide
earned income access services or participate in any earned income service
transaction after the officer, director, or employee has been suspended or
removed by an order issued by the commissioner;
h. Failed to maintain the required bond;
i. Failed to maintain any required registration with the secretary of state; or
j. No longer meets the requirements for licensure under this chapter.
2. An order issued by the commissioner under this section must contain a notice of
opportunity for hearing under chapter 28 - 32 .
3. If a hearing is not requested within twenty business days of the date of service upon
the licensee, the order becomes final.
Temporary suspension - Appeal.
1. If the commissioner determines probable cause exists for the suspension or
revocation of a license, that enforcement of this chapter requires immediate
suspension of the license pending investigation, or that probable cause exists to
indicate the continued operation of a licensee ' s business may create a significant risk
of serious and ongoing harm to the public while a disciplinary action is pending, the
commissioner may, upon written notice to the licensee, issue an ex parte order
suspending the license.
Page No. 8 25.1073.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
2. An ex parte order remains in effect until a final order is issued after a full hearing and
appeal is conducted in accordance with chapter 28 - 32 or until the suspension is
otherwise terminated by the commissioner. If a hearing is not requested within twenty
business days of the date of service of the order upon the licensee, the order becomes
final.
3. The commissioner shall conduct a full hearing on the merits of the evidence
warranting immediate suspension to determine if disciplinary action must be taken
against the licensee.
4. The licensee may appeal the ex parte temporary suspension order before a full
hearing is conducted. For purposes of appeal, the district court shall decide whether
the commissioner acted reasonably or arbitrarily. The court shall give priority to the
appeal for prompt disposition.
Suspension and removal of earned wage access service provider officers and
employees.
1. The commissioner may issue upon any current or former officer, director, or employee
of a licensed business entity, and upon the licensee involved, an order stating:
a. That the current or former officer, director, or employee is engaging or has
engaged in any of the following conduct:
(1) Violation of a law, rule, order, or written agreement with the commissioner;
(2) Harassment or abuse, false or misleading representations to the
commissioner, or unfair practices; or
(3) An act of commission or omission or practice which constitutes breach o f
trust or a breach of fiduciary duty.
b. The term of suspension or removal from employment and participation within the
conduct or the affairs of an earned wage access service provider.
2. An order issued by the commissioner under this section must contain a notice of
opportunity for hearing under chapter 28 - 32. The order becomes effective immediately
upon issuance on the officer, director, or employee, and remains in effect pending the
outcome of a hearing held in accordance with chapter 28 - 32 .
3. If a hearing is not requested within twenty business days of the date the order is
served, the order becomes final and the officer, director, or employee must be
Page No. 9 25.1073.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
removed from any further participation in the affairs of, or employment with, the
licensee.
4. A contested or default suspension or removal order is effective immediately upon
issuance of the final order on the current or former officer or employee and upon the
licensee. A consent order is effective as agreed upon in the order. Any current or
former officer or employee suspended or removed from employment and participation
within the conduct or the affairs of a licensee under this section is not eligible, while
under suspension or removal, to be employed or otherwise participate in the affairs of
any financial corporation, financial institution, credit union, or any other entity licensed
by the department of financial institutions.
5. When a current or former officer or employee or other person participating in the
conduct of the affairs of a licensee is charged with a felony in state or federal court
which involves dishonesty, fraud, or breach of trust, the commissioner may
immediately suspend the individual from office or prohibit the individual from further
participation in the earned wage access service provider affairs, or both. The order is
effective immediately upon issuance of the order on the licensee and the individua l
charged and remains in effect until the criminal charge is finally disposed of or until
modified by the commissioner. If a judgment of conviction, federal pretrial diversion, or
similar state order or judgment is entered, the commissioner may order the
suspension or prohibition be made permanent. A finding of not guilty or other
disposition of the charge does not preclude the commissioner from pursuing
administrative or civil remedies.
6. The commissioner may deny an application to renew a license if the licensee no
longer meets the criteria for licensure or otherwise fails to comply with this chapter.
Violations - Cease and desist orders - Penalties.
Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, any person that provides earned wage access
services without a license is guilty of a class C felony and any person that violates any other
provision of this chapter or any rule adopted under this chapter is guilty of an infraction. If the
commissioner finds, whether without a hearing or after a hearing if a hearing is requested within
twenty days of notice of an action by the commissioner, a person violated this chapter or any
rule adopted under chapter, the commissioner may:
Page No. 10 25.1073.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
1. Order the person to cease and desist violating this chapter or the rule;
2. Require the refund of any charges collected by the person in violation of this chapter ;
or
3. Impose a civil penalty not to exceed one hundred thousand dollars per violation upon
a person that willfully violates a law, rule, written agreement, or order under this
chapter. An interested party may appeal the assessment of a civil money penalty
under chapter 28 - 32 by filing a written notice of appeal within twenty days after service
of the assessment of civil money penalties. A civil money penalty collected under this
section must be paid to the state treasurer and deposited in the financial institutions
regulatory fund.
Investigations and examinations.
1. A licensee shall pay an examination or visitation fee, and the commissioner shall
charge the licensee for the actual cost of the examination or visitation at an hourly rate
set by the commissioner which is sufficient to cover all reasonable expenses
associated with the examination or visitation.
2. a. Except as otherwise provided in Public Law 110-289, section 1512, the
requirements under any federal law, chapter 44 - 04, or section 6 - 01 - 07.1 ,
regarding the privacy or confidentiality of any information or material provided to
the nationwide multistate licensing system and registry, and any privilege arising
under federal or state law, including the rules of any federal or state court, with
respect to the information or material, continue to apply to the information or
material after the information or material has been disclosed to the nationwide
multistate licensing system and registry. Any information and material may be
shared with all state and federal regulatory officials with mortgage industry
oversight authority without the loss of privilege or the loss of confidentiality
protections provided by federal law, chapter 44 - 04, or section 6 - 01 - 07.1 .
b. The commissioner may enter agreements or sharing arrangements with other
governmental agencies, the conference of state bank supervisors, the American
association of residential mortgage regulators, or other associations representing
governmental agencies.
Page No. 11 25.1073.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
c. Information or material subject to a privilege or confidentiality under this section is
not subject to:
(1) Disclosure under any federal or state law governing the disclosure to the
public of information held by an officer or an agency of the federal
government or the respective state; or
(2) Subpoena or discovery, or admission into evidence, in any administrative
process, unless with respect to any privilege held by the nationwide
multistate licensing system and registry with respect to the information or
material, the person to which the information or material pertains waives, in
whole or in part, in the discretion of the person, that privilege.
d. The commissioner shall take all necessary steps, under any applicable law or
rule, to protect the disclosure of information or material subject to a privilege or
confidentiality under this section. Records subject to a privilege or confidentiality
may be required to be disclosed only pursuant to an order of the court. The court
ordering the disclosure shall issue a protective order to protect the confidential
nature of the records.
Required acts and practices.
A person required to be licensed under this chapter shall:
1. Develop and implement policies and procedures to respond to questions raised by
consumers and address complaints from consumers in an expedient manner.
2. Offer to the consumer at least one reasonable option to obtain proceeds at no cost to
the consumer and clearly explain how to elect the no-cost option when the person
offers a consumer the option to receive proceeds for a charge or solicits an optional
tip, gratuity, or other donation.
3. Before entering into an agreement with a consumer for the provision of earned wage
access services:
a. Inform the consumer of the consumer's rights under the agreement; and
b. Fully and clearly disclose all charges associated with the earned wage access
services.
4. Inform the consumer of any material changes to the terms and conditions of the
earned wage access services before implementing those changes for that consumer.
Page No. 12 25.1073.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
5. Allow the consumer to cancel use of the provider's earned wage access services at
any time, without incurring a cancellation charge imposed by the provider.
6. Comply with all applicable local, state, and federal privacy and information security
laws.
7. If soliciting, charging, or receiving a tip, gratuity, or other donation from a consumer,
clearly and conspicuously disclose to the consumer immediately before each
transaction that a tip, gratuity, or other donation amount may be zero and is voluntary.
8. If soliciting, charging, or receiving a tip, gratuity, or other donation from a consumer,
clearly and conspicuously disclose in its service contract with the consumer and
elsewhere that tips, gratuities, or donations are voluntary and that the offering of
earned wage access services, including the amount of proceeds a consumer is eligible
to request and the frequency with which proceeds are provided to a consumer, is not
contingent on whether the consumer pays a tip, gratuity, or other donation or on the
size of the tip, gratuity, or other donation.
9. Provide proceeds to a consumer by any means mutually agreed upon by the
consumer and the provider.
10. If the provider will seek repayment of outstanding proceeds or payment of charges or
other amounts owed, including voluntary tips, gratuities, or other donations, in
connection with the activities covered by this chapter, from a consumer's account at a
depository institution, including by means of electronic fund transfer:
a. Comply with applicable provisions of the Electronic Fund Transfer Act of 1978,
[15 U.S.C. 1693-1693r], and regulations adopted under the the Electronic Fund
Transfer Act; and
b. Reimburse the consumer for the full amount of any overdraft or nonsufficient
funds charges imposed on a consumer by the consumer's depository institution
which were caused by the provider attempting to seek payment of any
outstanding proceeds, charges, or other payments, in connection with the
activities covered by this chapter, including voluntary tips, gratuities, or other
donations, on a date before, or in an incorrect amount from, the date or amount
disclosed to the consumer. The provider is not subject to the requirements in this
Page No. 13 25.1073.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
subdivision with respect to payments of outstanding proceeds or charges
incurred by a consumer through fraudulent or other unlawful means.
Prohibited acts and practices.
1. A person required to be licensed under this chapter may not:
a. Make or cause to be made any material false statement or representation in any
application or other document or statement required to be filed under any
provision of this chapter, or to omit any material statement or fact necessary to
make the statements not misleading.
b. Fail to make disclosures as required by this chapter and rules adopted under this
chapter.
c. Fail to comply with this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter applicable to
any business authorized or conducted under this chapter.
d. Negligently make a false statement or an omission of material fact in connection
with any information or reports filed with a governmental agency of this state or
the nationwide multistate licensing system and registry or in connection with any
investigation conducted by the commissioner or another governmental agency or
this state.
e. Share with an employer a portion of any charges, voluntary tips, gratuities, or
other donations that were received from or charged to a consumer for earned
wage access services.
f. Require a consumer's credit report or a credit score provided or issued by a
consumer reporting agency to determine a consumer's eligibility for earned wage
access services.
g. Accept payment of outstanding proceeds, charges, voluntary tips, gratuities, or
other donations from a consumer by means of a credit card or charge card.
h. Charge a consumer a late charge, deferral charge, interest, or any other penalty
or charge for failure to pay outstanding proceeds, charges, voluntary tips,
gratuities, or other donations.
i. Report to a consumer reporting agency or debt collector any information about
the consumer regarding the inability of the provider to be repaid outstanding
proceeds, charges, voluntary tips, gratuities, or other donations.
Page No. 14 25.1073.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
j. Compel or attempt to compel payment by a consumer of outstanding proceeds,
charges, voluntary tips, gratuities, or other donations to the provider through:
(1) A suit against the consumer in a court of competent jurisdiction.
(2) Use of a third party to pursue collection from the consumer on the provider's
behalf.
(3) Sale of outstanding proceeds, charges, voluntary tips, gratuities, or other
donations to a third-party collector or debt buyer for collection from a
consumer.
k. Mislead or deceive a consumer about the voluntary nature of the tips, gratuities,
or donations or represent the amounts will benefit any specific individuals or
group of individuals.
2. The limitations in subdivision j of subsection 1 do not preclude the use by a provider o f
any of the methods specified in that subdivision to compel payment of outstanding
proceeds or charges incurred by a consumer through fraudulent or other unlawful
means. The limitations in subdivision j of subsection 1 do not preclude a provider from
pursuing an employer for breach of the employer's contractual obligations to the
provider.
Reporting requirements.
A licensee shall file with the commissioner, at a time and in the manner specified by the
commissioner, a report containing data requested by the commissioner. The report must be filed
under oath.
Regulations and rulings.
The commissioner may adopt rules and regulations, conduct hearings, and make specific
rulings, orders, demands, and findings as may be necessary for the proper conduct of the
business authorized and licensed under and for the enforcement of this chapter.
Operation of existing providers.
1. A provider operating in this state on January 1, 2025, may continue to act as a
provider if the person:
a. Applies for licensure in accordance with this section within six months of the date
the commissioner makes an application available to potential applicants; and
b. Complies with the requirements of this chapter.
Page No. 15 25.1073.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
2. A person operating in this state on January 1, 2025, may continue to act as a provider
until the commissioner grants or denies the person's application for licensure under
this section.
Page No. 16 25.1073.02000